apertium-mk-bg.bg.dix
    <pardef n="доб/ър__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ър</l>
          <r>ър<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>рия</l>
          <r>ър<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>рият</l>
          <r>ър<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ра</l>
          <r>ър<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>рата</l>
          <r>ър<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ро</l>
          <r>ър<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>рото</l>
          <r>ър<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ри</l>
          <r>ър<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>рите</l>
          <r>ър<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="бивш__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ия</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ият</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ата</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>етo</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ите</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="коз/и__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r>и<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ия</l>
          <r>и<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ият</l>
          <r>и<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>я</l>
          <r>и<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ята</l>
          <r>и<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r>и<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>етo</l>
          <r>и<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r>и<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ите</l>
          <r>и<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="вод/ен__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ен</l>
          <r>ен<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ния</l>
          <r>ен<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ният</l>
          <r>ен<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>на</l>
          <r>ен<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ната</l>
          <r>ен<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>но</l>
          <r>ен<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ното</l>
          <r>ен<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ни</l>
          <r>ен<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ните</l>
          <r>ен<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="дъл/ъг__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ъг</l>
          <r>ъг<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>гия</l>
          <r>ъг<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>гият</l>
          <r>ъг<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>га</l>
          <r>ъг<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>гата</l>
          <r>ъг<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>го</l>
          <r>ъг<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>гото</l>
          <r>ъг<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ги</l>
          <r>ъг<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>гите</l>
          <r>ъг<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Interjections -->

    <pardef n="бива__ij">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="ij"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
 
    <!-- Abbreviations -->

    <pardef n="км__abbr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="abbr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="км"><i>км</i><par n="км__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="м"><i>м</i><par n="км__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="см"><i>см</i><par n="км__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="гр"><i>гр</i><par n="км__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="год"><i>год</i><par n="км__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="св"><i>св</i><par n="км__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="др"><i>др</i><par n="км__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="сем"><i>сем</i><par n="км__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="пр.н.е."><i>пр.н.е.</i><par n="км__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="воден"><par n="P__adj"/><i>вод</i><par n="вод/ен__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="кози"><par n="P__adj"/><i>коз</i><par n="коз/и__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="добър"><par n="P__adj"/><i>доб</i><par n="доб/ър__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="бивш"><par n="P__adj"/><i>бивш</i><par n="бивш__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="дълъг"><par n="P__adj"/><i>дъл</i><par n="дъл/ъг__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="бива"><i>бива</i><par n="бива__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="стига"><i>стига</i><par n="бива__ij"/></e>
